sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti: Umetnost in ročna dela; Zbirateljski predmeti; Pripomočki za domače pivovarstvo in vinarstvo; Žongliranje; Čarovnija in posebnosti; Izdelava modelov; Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre; Glasbila
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество: Искусство и рукоделие; Коллекционные предметы; Товары для домашнего пивоварения и виноделия; Жонглирование; Безделушки и товары для фокусов и розыгрышей; Моделизм; Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре; Музыкальные инструменты
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts: Arts & Crafts; Collectibles; Homebrewing & Winemaking Supplies; Juggling; Magic & Novelties; Model Making; Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories; Musical Instruments
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative: Artigianato e hobby; Collezionismo; Produzione casalinga di birra e vino; Giocoleria; Magia e oggetti insoliti; Modellismo; Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali; Strumenti musicali
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti: Umjetnost i rukotvorine; Kolekcionarstvo; Oprema za proizvodnju domaćeg piva i vina; Žongliranje; Čarolija i neobični predmeti; Izrada modela; Pribor za glazbala i orkestar; Glazbala
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet: Művészet és barkácsolás; Gyűjtemények; Házi sörfőzési és borkészítési kellékek; Zsonglőrködés; Varázslat és újdonságok; Modellkészítés; Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők; Hangszerek
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde: Håndarbejde og hobby; Samleobjekter; Hjemmebrygning; Jonglering; Trylleri og festartikler; Modelbyggeri; Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør; Musikinstrumenter
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă: Artizanat; Obiecte de colecție; Produse pentru prepararea berii și a vinului; Jonglerie; Magie și jucării pentru adulți; Creare de modele și machete; Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră; Instrumente muzicale
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs: Loisirs créatifs; Articles de collection; Fournitures pour fabrication artisanale de bière et de vin; Jonglage; Magie et nouveautés; Modélisme; Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres; Instruments de musique
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne: Výtvarná dielňa; Zberateľské predmety; Potreby na domácu výrobu piva a vína; Žonglovanie; Novinky v mágii; Modelárstvo; Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje; Hudobné nástroje
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet: Kunst og håndverk; Samleobjekter; Utstyr for hjemmebrygging og vinmaking; Sjonglering; Magi og trylling; Modellmaking; Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre; Musikkinstrumenter
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες: Τέχνες & Χειροτεχνίες; Συλλεκτικά αντικείμενα; Προμήθειες οικιακής ζυθοποιίας & οινοποίησης; Ζογκλερική; Μαγεία & πρωτότυπα αντικείμενα; Κατασκευή μοντέλων; Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας; Μουσικά όργανα
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne: Sztuka i rękodzieło; Artykuły kolekcjonerskie; Warzenie piwa i pędzenie wina; Przybory do żonglowania; Magia i sztuczki; Modelarstwo; Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych; Instrumenty muzyczne
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술: 미술/공예; 수집품; 홈브루잉/와인 제조 용품; 저글링; 마술용품/이색 제품; 모형 제작; 악기/오케스트라 부대용품; 악기
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes: Arte e artesanato; Artigos colecionáveis; Suprimentos para fabricação caseira de cerveja e vinho; Malabarismo; Mágica e bugigangas; Construção de maquetes; Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras; Instrumentos musicais
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์: ศิลปะและงานฝีมือ; ของสะสม; อุปกรณ์ต้มหรือกลั่นเหล้าและเครื่องทำไวน์; จั้กกลิ้ง; มายากลและความแปลกใหม่; การทำโมเดล; เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา; เครื่องดนตรี
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства: Изкуства и творчество; Колекционерски предмети; Консумативи за домашно пивоварство и винопроизводство; Жонглиране; Магия и магически аксесоари; Изработка на модели; Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри; Музикални инструменти
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション: クラフト・アート; コレクションアイテム; 自家醸造用品; ジャグリング; 手品グッズ; 模型; 楽器関連用品; 楽器
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas: Artes e trabalhos manuais; Objetos de coleção; Artigos para fabrico em casa de vinho e cerveja; Malabarismo; Magia e novidades; Modelismo; Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra; Instrumentos musicais
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術: 藝術品和手工藝品; 收藏品; 釀酒用品; 雜技用品; 魔術道具; 模型製作; 樂器配件; 樂器
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas: Manualidades; Coleccionables; Productos para elaborar cerveza y vino en casa; Juegos malabares; Trucos de magia; Modelismo; Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta; Instrumentos musicales
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar: Sanatlar ve El İşleri; Koleksiyonlar; Evde Bira ve Şarap Yapım Malzemeleri; Jonglör Malzemeleri; Sihirli ve Hediyelik Eşyalar; Maket Yapımı; Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları; Müzik Aletleri
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden: Handwerk en hobby's; Verzamelobjecten; Benodigdheden voor thuis bierbrouwen en wijnmaken; Jongleren; Goochelen en goochelaccessoires; Modelbouw; Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten; Muziekinstrumenten
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst: Kunsthandwerk & Hobby; Sammlerstücke; Zubehör für Bier- & Weinherstellung; Jonglieren; Zauberbedarf; Modellbau; Zubehör für Musikinstrumente; Musikinstrumente
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo: Đồ thủ công mỹ nghệ; Đồ sưu tầm; Đồ dùng nấu rượu cho gia đình; Môn tung hứng; Dụng cụ ảo thuật & đồ chơi vui nhộn; Tạo mẫu; Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ; Nhạc cụ
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作: 手工艺品; 收藏品; 酿酒设备/材料; 杂耍; 魔术道具; 模型制作; 乐器与管弦乐队配件; 乐器
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet: Taide ja askartelu; Keräilykohteet; Oluen ja viinin valmistustarvikkeet; Jongleeraus; Taikuus ja lahjatavarat; Pienoismalli­välineet; Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet; Soittimet
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande: Hantverk och hobbyer; Samlarobjekt; Tillbehör för hembryggeri och vintillverkning; Jonglering; Magi och skämtartiklar; Modelltillverkning; Tillbehör till musikinstrument; Musikinstrument
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění: Řemesla a koníčky; Sběratelské předměty; Potřeby pro domácí výrobu piva nebo vína; Žonglování; Kouzla a triky; Modelářství; Hudební nástroje – příslušenství; Hudební nástroje
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai: Menai ir amatai; Kolekcionuojami daiktai; Alaus ir vyno gaminimo namuose reikmenys; Žongliravimas; Magija ir naujovės; Modelių gamyba; Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai; Muzikos instrumentai